pl: Skala pojazdu do zabawy: 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:25; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:48; 1:50; 1:55; 1:64; 1:72; 1:87; Brak skali; Inna
fi: Leluauton mittakaava: 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:25; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:48; 1:50; 1:55; 1:64; 1:72; 1:87; Ei mittakaavassa; Muu
en: Play vehicle scale: 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:25; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:48; 1:50; 1:55; 1:64; 1:72; 1:87; Not to scale; Other
nb: Lekebilskala: 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:25; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:48; 1:50; 1:55; 1:64; 1:72; 1:87; Ikke i skala; Annet
th: เล่นรถขยายสเกล: 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:25; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:48; 1:50; 1:55; 1:64; 1:72; 1:87; ไม่ระบุสเกล; อื่นๆ
fr: Échelle du véhicule miniature: 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:25; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:48; 1:50; 1:55; 1:64; 1:72; 1:87; Pas à l’échelle; Autre
it: Scala del veicolo giocattolo: 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:25; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:48; 1:50; 1:55; 1:64; 1:72; 1:87; Non in scala; Altro
ro-RO: Scara (raportul de mărime) a vehiculului de jucărie: 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:25; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:48; 1:50; 1:55; 1:64; 1:72; 1:87; Fără scară; Altele
tr: Oyuncak araç ölçek oranı: 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:25; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:48; 1:50; 1:55; 1:64; 1:72; 1:87; Ölçeksiz; Diğer
ko: 장난감 차량 축척: 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:25; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:48; 1:50; 1:55; 1:64; 1:72; 1:87; 스케일 없음; 기타
lt-LT: Žaislinės transporto priemonės mastelis: 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:25; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:48; 1:50; 1:55; 1:64; 1:72; 1:87; Ne pagal mastelį; Kita
cs: Měřítko hracích vozidel: 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:25; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:48; 1:50; 1:55; 1:64; 1:72; 1:87; Není v měřítku; Jiné
zh-TW: 玩具車比例: 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:25; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:48; 1:50; 1:55; 1:64; 1:72; 1:87; 未按比例; 其他
hr-HR: Vage za igranje vozila: 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:25; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:48; 1:50; 1:55; 1:64; 1:72; 1:87; Nije u mjerilu; Ostalo
pt-BR: Veículo de brinquedo escala: 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:25; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:48; 1:50; 1:55; 1:64; 1:72; 1:87; Fora de escala; Outro
es: Escala del vehículo de juguete: 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:25; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:48; 1:50; 1:55; 1:64; 1:72; 1:87; Sin escala; Otro
ja: おもちゃの乗り物の比率: 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:25; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:48; 1:50; 1:55; 1:64; 1:72; 1:87; スケールなし; その他
sl-SI: Merilo igralnega vozila: 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:25; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:48; 1:50; 1:55; 1:64; 1:72; 1:87; Ni v merilu; Drugo
da: Legekøretøjs skala: 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:25; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:48; 1:50; 1:55; 1:64; 1:72; 1:87; Ikke målestokstro; Andet
bg-BG: Мащаб на играчката-превозно средство: 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:25; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:48; 1:50; 1:55; 1:64; 1:72; 1:87; Без мащаб; Други
ru: Масштаб игрушечного транспортного средства: 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:25; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:48; 1:50; 1:55; 1:64; 1:72; 1:87; Без масштаба; Другое
hu: Játékjármű méretaránya: 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:25; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:48; 1:50; 1:55; 1:64; 1:72; 1:87; Nem méretarányos; Egyéb
pt-PT: Expansão de veículos de jogo: 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:25; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:48; 1:50; 1:55; 1:64; 1:72; 1:87; Sem escala; Outra
zh-CN: 玩具车比例: 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:25; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:48; 1:50; 1:55; 1:64; 1:72; 1:87; 无比例; 其他
sv: Skala för lekfordon: 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:25; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:48; 1:50; 1:55; 1:64; 1:72; 1:87; Ej skalenlig; Övrigt
el: Κλίμακα μεγέθους οχήματος παιχνιδιού: 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:25; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:48; 1:50; 1:55; 1:64; 1:72; 1:87; Χωρίς κλίμακα; Άλλο
vi: Tỷ lệ xe đồ chơi: 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:25; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:48; 1:50; 1:55; 1:64; 1:72; 1:87; Không theo tỷ lệ; Khác
sk-SK: Mierka hračkárskeho vozidla: 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:25; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:48; 1:50; 1:55; 1:64; 1:72; 1:87; Bez mierky; Iné
de: Maßstab des Spielfahrzeugs: 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:25; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:48; 1:50; 1:55; 1:64; 1:72; 1:87; Nicht maßstabsgetreu; Sonstige
nl: Speelvoertuig schaal: 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:25; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:48; 1:50; 1:55; 1:64; 1:72; 1:87; Niet op schaal; Overig